src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROP_VALGEI !!≈ @CODE@ 
!! Back	vowel
!! Gradation NA
  PROP_VALGEI-SG ;
  PROP_VALGEI-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_VALGEI-SG !!≈ @CODE@ 
:%{back%} NMN_VALGEI/LIBEI-SG ;

LEXICON PROP_VALGEI-PL !!≈ @CODE@ 
:%{back%} NMN_VALGEI/LIBEI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP-PLC_VALGEI !!≈ @CODE@ valgei:valge
!+Sem/Plc:%{back%} NMN_VALGEI/LIBEI ;




!! ### TWO-SYLLABLE LEMMA THREE-SYLLABLE STEM

LEXICON PROP_KARJAL !!≈ @CODE@ karjal:karjal
!! Back vowel
!! Gradation NA
!! Singular stem vowel 0/a
!! Plural stem vowel o
:%{back%} NMN_KARJAL ;

!LEXICON PROP-PLC_KARJAL !!≈ @CODE@ karjal:karjal
!+Sem/Plc:%{back%} NMN_KARJAL ;

LEXICON PROP-MAL_KARJAL !!≈ @CODE@ 
+Sem/Mal:%{back%} NMN_KARJAL ;

LEXICON PROP_KARJALAINE !!≈ @CODE@ karjalaine:karjala
:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;
!LEXICON PROP-PLC_KARJALAINE !!≈ @CODE@ karjalaine:karjala
!+Sem/Plc:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;

LEXICON PROP_KIELINE !!≈ @CODE@ kieline:kieli
:%{front%} NMN_NAINE/KIELINE ;
!LEXICON PROP-PLC_KIELINE !!≈ @CODE@ kieline:kieli
!+Sem/Plc:%{front%} NMN_NAINE/KIELINE ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_TVER !!≈ **@CODE@** Tver:Tver
+Sem/Plc:%{front%} NMN_TVER ;

LEXICON PROP_TAIGIN
:%{back%}   NMN_TAIGIN  ;
!LEXICON PROP-MAL_TAIGIN
!+Sem/Mal:   NMN_TAIGIN  ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_TAIGIN !!≈ **@CODE@**
+Sem/Plc:%{back%} NMN_TAIGIN  ;

!LEXICON PROP-PLC_TOVESTEH !!≈ __@CODE@__ tovesteh:tovesteh
!+Sem/Plc:%{front%} NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH ;
!LEXICON PROP_TOVESTEH !!≈ __@CODE@__ tovesteh:tovesteh
!:%{front%} NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH ;

!LEXICON PROP-PLC_PEREH !!≈ __@CODE@__ pereh:pereh
!+Sem/Plc:%{front%} NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH ;
LEXICON PROP_PEREH !!≈ **@CODE@** pereh:pereh
:%{front%} NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH ;

!LEXICON	 PROP-PLC_VIDEL !!≈ __@CODE@__ videl:videl
!+Sem/Plc:%{front%} NMN_VIDEL ;

LEXICON PROP_VIDEL !!≈ **@CODE@** videl:videl
:%{front%} NMN_VIDEL ;

LEXICON PROP_RUS-IN_SUR
:a PROP_KALA_SURFEM     ;
+Sem/Sur+Sem/Mal:   NMN_TAIGIN  ;

LEXICON PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR !! * @CODE@ Pavlovič:Pavlov
:na PROP_KALA_PATRFEM	;
+Patr+Sem/Mal:ič   NMN_TAIGIN	;
 PROP_RUS-V_SUR ; 

LEXICON PROP_RUS-V_SUR
:a PROP_KALA_SURFEM	;
+Sem/Sur+Sem/Mal:   NMN_ABRAMOV	;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_ALUS !!≈ @CODE@ Alus:Aluks
+Sem/Plc:%{back%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES ;

LEXICON PROP_ALUS !!≈ @CODE@ Alus:Aluks
:%{back%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KONDII
+Sem/Plc:%{back%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII ;
LEXICON PROP_KONDII !!≈ @CODE@ kondii:kondi
:%{back%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII ;

!LEXICON PROP-PLC_STIPENDII
!+Sem/Plc:%{front%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII ;
LEXICON PROP_STIPENDII !!≈ @CODE@ kondii:kondi
:%{front%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII ;

LEXICON HUMAN-PROP-DERIVATION
%-nimelline:%-#nimelli A_KIELINE ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
