src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Akimov+N+Prop:Akimov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Aleksandr+N+Prop:Aleksandr PROP_TAIGIN  "Aleksandr" ;
Aleksandrov+N+Prop:Aleksandrov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Aleksejev+N+Prop:Aleksejev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Aleksejev+N+Prop:Aleksejev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Alevtin+N+Prop:Alevtin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Alʼfin+N+Prop:Alʼfin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Anatolii+N+Prop:Anatoli PROP_KONDII  "Anatoli" ;
Anatoljev+N+Prop:Anatoljev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Andrejev+N+Prop:Andrejev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Anikin+N+Prop:Anikin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Antonov+N+Prop:Antonov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Anus+N+Prop:Anuks PROP_ALUS  "Aunus" ;
Avgustov+N+Prop:Avgustov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Baburov+N+Prop:Baburov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Barbašin+N+Prop:Barbašin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Barmin+N+Prop:Barmin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Belʼakov+N+Prop:Belʼakov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Berezin+N+Prop:Berezin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Biblii+N+Prop:Bibli PROP_STIPENDII  "Raamattu" ;
Bobin+N+Prop:Bobin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Bondarev+N+Prop:Bondarev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Borisov+N+Prop:Borisov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Bukin+N+Prop:Bukin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Cikin+N+Prop:Cikin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Cuburov+N+Prop:Cuburov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Digujev+N+Prop:Digujev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Dmitrii+N+Prop:Dmitri PROP_KONDII  "Dmitri" ;
Dmitrijev+N+Prop:Dmitrijev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Domantov+N+Prop:Domantov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Dubinin+N+Prop:Dubinin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Fedotov+N+Prop:Fedotov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Fedulov+N+Prop:Fedulov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Fodorov+N+Prop:Fodorov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Fokin+N+Prop:Fokin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Fomin+N+Prop:Fomin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Fʼodorov+N+Prop:Fʼodorov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Fʼoudorov+N+Prop:Fʼoudorov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Gagarin+N+Prop:Gagarin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Gavrilov+N+Prop:Gavrilov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Gdaljev+N+Prop:Gdaljev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Genrihov+N+Prop:Genrihov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Gerasimov+N+Prop:Gerasimov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Ginijatullin+N+Prop:Ginijatullin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Gorohov+N+Prop:Gorohov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Grigorjev+N+Prop:Grigorjev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Grigorjev+N+Prop:Grigorjev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Grišin+N+Prop:Grišin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Gukkin+N+Prop:Gukkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Haritonov+N+Prop:Haritonov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Heikkijev+N+Prop:Heikkijev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Hristos+N+Prop:Hristos PROP_TAIGIN  "" ;
Hudilainen+N+Prop:Hudila PROP_KARJALAINE  "Hudilainen" ;
Hvatov+N+Prop:Hvatov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Ignatjev+N+Prop:Ignatjev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Iisus+N+Prop:Iisus PROP_TAIGIN  "" ;
Ilʼjin+N+Prop:Ilʼjin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Ipatov+N+Prop:Ipatov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Ivan+N+Prop:Ivan PROP_TAIGIN  "Ivan" ;
Ivanov+N+Prop:Ivanov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Jakovlev+N+Prop:Jakovlev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Jakovlev+N+Prop:Jakovlev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Jegorov+N+Prop:Jegorov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Jegorov+N+Prop:Jegorov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Jelagin+N+Prop:Jelagin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Jevangelii+N+Prop:Jevangeli PROP_KONDII  "Evankeliumi" ;
Jevgenjev+N+Prop:Jevgenjev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Jevsejev+N+Prop:Jevsejev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Judin+N+Prop:Judin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Jumal+N+Prop:Jumal PROP_TAIGIN  "" ;
Jurjev+N+Prop:Jurjev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Karakin+N+Prop:Karakin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Karjal+N+Prop:Karjal PROP_TAIGIN  "Karjala" ;
Karkavin+N+Prop:Karkavin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Karlov+N+Prop:Karlov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Karlov+N+Prop:Karlov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Kačalkin+N+Prop:Kačalkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Kimov+N+Prop:Kimov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Kirsanov+N+Prop:Kirsanov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Klementjev+N+Prop:Klementjev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Kokovurov+N+Prop:Kokovurov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Kononihin+N+Prop:Kononihin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Kopanev+N+Prop:Kopanev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Koškin+N+Prop:Koškin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Krasavtsev+N+Prop:Krasavtsev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Kuznetsov+N+Prop:Kuznetsov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Kvirinii+N+Prop:Kvirini PROP_KONDII  "Kyrenius" ;
Lapin+N+Prop:Lapin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Lenin+N+Prop:Lenin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Leonidov+N+Prop:Leonidov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Lihačov+N+Prop:Lihačov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Lopuhin+N+Prop:Lopuhin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Lʼovkin+N+Prop:Lʼovkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Markianov+N+Prop:Markianov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Matvejev+N+Prop:Matvejev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Melentjev+N+Prop:Melentjev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Messii+N+Prop:Messi PROP_KONDII  "Messias" ;
Mihailov+N+Prop:Mihailov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Mihnev+N+Prop:Mihnev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Mokejev+N+Prop:Mokejev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Mrikin+N+Prop:Mrikin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Nesterov+N+Prop:Nesterov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Nikitin+N+Prop:Nikitin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Nikolajev+N+Prop:Nikolajev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Olʼkin+N+Prop:Olʼkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Pahomov+N+Prop:Pahomov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Pavlov+N+Prop:Pavlov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Petrunin+N+Prop:Petrunin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Polikarpov+N+Prop:Polikarpov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Poluzanov+N+Prop:Poluzanov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Povarʼov+N+Prop:Povarʼov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Puškin+N+Prop:Puškin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Ragujev+N+Prop:Ragujev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Redʼkin+N+Prop:Redʼkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Räppijev+N+Prop:Räppijev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Serafin+N+Prop:Serafin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Sergejev+N+Prop:Sergejev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Sergejev+N+Prop:Sergejev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Skomorošin+N+Prop:Skomorošin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Spitsin+N+Prop:Spitsin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Stepanov+N+Prop:Stepanov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Strogalʼščikov+N+Prop:Strogalʼščikov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Tikkujev+N+Prop:Tikkujev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Tutturev+N+Prop:Tutturev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Tʼurin+N+Prop:Tʼurin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Urbanov+N+Prop:Urbanov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Veršinin+N+Prop:Veršinin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Viktorov+N+Prop:Viktorov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Vladimirov+N+Prop:Vladimirov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Voronov+N+Prop:Voronov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Wikipedii+N+Prop:Wikipedi PROP_KONDII  "Wikipedia" ;
Zvezdin+N+Prop:Zvezdin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Čuburov+N+Prop:Čuburov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Miljoonasade+N+Prop:Miljoonasade PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Keitele+N+Prop:Keitele PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Häme+N+Prop:Häme PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Kolpene+N+Prop:Kolpene PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Päivärinne+N+Prop:Päivärinne PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Mäkirinne+N+Prop:Mäkirinne PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Pohjanrinne+N+Prop:Pohjanrinne PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Pojanrinne+N+Prop:Pojanrinne PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Suomenrinne+N+Prop:Suomenrinne PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Kone+N+Prop:Kone PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Tampere+N+Prop:Tampere PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Jouste+N+Prop:Jouste PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Vuoskåive+N+Prop:Vuoskåive PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Vuoskäive+N+Prop:Vuoskäive PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Mink+N+Prop:Mink PROP-PLC_TVER  "" ;
Etyk+N+Prop:Etyk PROP-PLC_TVER  "" ;
Porocup+N+Prop:Porocup PROP_TAIGIN  "" ;
Kesänkikeidas+N+Prop:Kesänkikeidaks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Kahvikeidas+N+Prop:Kahvikeidaks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Oudas+N+Prop:Oudaks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Haukipudas+N+Prop:Haukipudaks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Äikäs+N+Prop:Äikäks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Kärkäs+N+Prop:Kärkäks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Sailas+N+Prop:Sailaks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Raekunnas+N+Prop:Raekunnaks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Kakslauttas+N+Prop:Kakslauttaks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Häkämies+N+Prop:Häkämies PROP_PEREH  "" ;
Launis+N+Prop:Launiks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Kyllös+N+Prop:Kyllöks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Eteläkierros+N+Prop:Eteläkierroks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Haukankierros+N+Prop:Haukankierroks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Karhunkierros+N+Prop:Karhunkierroks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Pohjoiskierros+N+Prop:Pohjoiskierroks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Antereus+N+Prop:Antereuks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Saamelaiskulttuurikeskus+N+Prop:Saamelaiskulttuurikeskuks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Kotimaisten% kielten% tutkimuskeskus+N+Prop:Kotimaisten% kielten% tutkimuskeskuks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Pavlus+N+Prop:Pavluks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Aakenus+N+Prop:Aakenuks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Kotus+N+Prop:Kotuks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
Niitselys+N+Prop:Niitselyks PROP_ALUS  "" ;
PAM+N+Prop:PAM PROP_TAIGIN  "PAM" ;
